Arkansas, session 2025, HB1216.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Title.
This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Free Market Zones
Act".

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code Title 26, Chapter 51, Subchapter 3, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
26-51-317. Business located in opportunity zone — Definition.
(a) As used in this section, “opportunity zone” means a population
census tract located in Arkansas that is designated as a qualified
opportunity zone under 26 U.S.C. § 1400Z-1, as of January 1, 2019.
(b) There is allowed an exemption from the income tax imposed by this
*JLL100*
03-10-2025 11:14:59 JLL100

As Engrossed: H3/10/25 HB1216
chapter for a business entity that:
(1) Locates in an opportunity zone on or after the effective
date of this act; and
(2) Is required to file a corporate income tax return under this
chapter.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 26-51-460 is repealed.
26-51-460. Opportunity zones — Definition.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, 26 U.S.C. §
1400Z-2, as in effect on January 1, 2018, regarding opportunity zones, is
adopted for the purpose of computing Arkansas income tax liability.
(b) As used in this section and for purposes of the adoption of 26
U.S.C. § 1400Z-2, “opportunity zone” means a population census tract located
in Arkansas that is designated as a qualified opportunity zone under 26
U.S.C. § 1400Z-1, as of January 1, 2019.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 26-54-102(b), concerning the entities that
are not included in the definition of "corporation" under the Arkansas
Corporate Franchise Tax Act of 1979, is amended to add an additional
subdivision to read as follows:
(4) A business entity that:
(A) Locates in an opportunity zone, as defined in § 26-51-
317, on or after the effective date of this act; and
(B) Is required to file a:
(i) Corporate income tax return under the Income Tax
Act of 1929, § 26-51-101 et seq.; or
(ii) Tax return under the Elective Pass-Through
Entity Tax Act, § 26-65-101 et seq.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code Title 26, Chapter 65, Subchapter 1, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
26-65-109. Exemption for business located in opportunity zone —
Definition.
(a) As used in this section, “opportunity zone” means a population
census tract located in Arkansas that is designated as a qualified
opportunity zone under 26 U.S.C. § 1400Z-1, as of January 1, 2019.
03-10-2025 11:14:59 JLL100

As Engrossed: H3/10/25 HB1216
(b) There is allowed an exemption from the tax imposed by this chapter
for a business entity that:
(1) Locates in an opportunity zone on or after the effective
date of this act; and
(2) Is subject to the tax levied under this chapter.

SECTION 6. EFFECTIVE DATE. Sections 1-5 of this act are effective for
tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2025.

/s/Long


























03-10-2025 11:14:59 JLL100